src/fst/affixes/numerals.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or feedback@divvun.no


!! # Bashkir number affixes



LEXICON Num_  !!≈ @CODE@ adds the tag **+Num**. With more content we move this to affixes.
+Num: numsg ;

LEXICON numsg
+Sg+Nom: # ;
+Sg+Acc: # ;
+Sg+Gen: # ;




LEXICON yeartagpl
          +Num+Sem/Year+Pl+Nom:    # ;
          +Num+Sem/Year+Pl+Gen:    # ;
          +Num+Sem/Year+Pl+Acc:    # ;
 +Num+Sem/Year+Err/Orth+Pl+Loc:%:s # ;

LEXICON dateyearcase
 dateyearcase_nullsuff ;
 dateyearcase_fullsuff ;

LEXICON dateyearcase_nullsuff
          +Sg+Nom: # ;
          +Sg+Gen: # ;
          +Sg+Acc: # ;
     +Sg+Ill+Attr: # ;
     +Sg+Loc+Attr: # ;

LEXICON dateyearcase_nullsuff_w_dot
          +Sg+Nom: MARKDOT ;
          +Sg+Gen: MARKDOT ;
          +Sg+Acc: MARKDOT ;
     +Sg+Ill+Attr: MARKDOT ;
     +Sg+Loc+Attr: MARKDOT ;

LEXICON dateyearcase_fullsuff
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Acc:%:a  #      ;
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Gen:%:a  #      ;
          +Sg+Loc:%:s  #      ;
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Loc:s    #      ;
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Loc:%:is #      ;
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Loc:is   #      ;
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Loc:%:as #      ;
          +Sg+Ill:%:i  #      ;
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Ill:i    #      ;
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Ill:%:ii #      ;
      +Cmp/SplitR:%-   ENDLEX ;
      +Cmp/SplitR:%–   ENDLEX ;


LEXICON ARABICCASES   !!≈ * **@CODE@**  adds +Arab
 +Arab:  DIGITCASES ;

LEXICON ARABICCASE   !!≈ * **@CODE@**  adds +Arab
 +Arab:  DIGITCASE ;

LEXICON ARABICCASE0   !!≈ * **@CODE@**  adds +Arab
 +Arab:  DIGITCASE0 ;


LEXICON DIGITCASES   !!≈ * **@CODE@**  to distinguish between 0 and oblique
DIGITCASE0 ;
DIGITCASE ;

LEXICON DIGITCASE0   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +Sg+Nom:      #      ;
 +Sg+Gen:      #      ;
 +Sg+Acc:      #      ;
 +Sg+Ill+Attr: #      ;
 +Sg+Loc+Attr: #      ;
 +Cmp/SplitR+Cmp:%-    ENDLEX ;
 +Cmp/SplitR+Cmp:%–    ENDLEX ;


LEXICON DIGITCASE
!  f+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:f       # ; ! s. 123f.
! ff+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:ff      # ; ! s. 123ff.
!  b+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:b       # ; ! § 123b
!  c+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:c       # ; ! § 123c
!  d+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:d       # ; ! § 123d
!  e+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:e       # ; ! § 123e
             +Sg+Ill:%>ân    # ;
             +Sg+Loc:%>st    # ;
             +Sg+Com:%>áin   # ;
                +Ess:%>n     # ;
                +Par:%>d     # ;
             +Pl+Gen:%>i     K ; !
             +Pl+Acc:%>id    K ; !
             +Pl+Ill:%>id    K ; ! 100:iide čuđiide
             +Pl+Loc:%>in    K ; !
             +Pl+Com:%>iguin K ; !

!ordinals

LEXICON ARABICCASEORD
  +Sg+Gen:%>da    K ;
! +Sg+Acc:%>dav   K ;
! +Sg+Ill:%>dij   K ;
! +Sg+Com:%>dijn  K ;
! +Sg+Ess:%>din   K ;
! +Pl+Nom:%>da    K ;
! +Pl+Gen:%>dij   K ;
! +Pl+Acc:%>dijt  K ;
! +Pl+Ill:%>dijda K ;
! +Pl+Com:%>dij   K ;

LEXICON ARABICCASEORD-ERR
  +Sg+Gen:%>a    K ;
! +Sg+Acc:%>av   K ;
! +Sg+Ill:%>ij   K ;
! +Sg+Com:%>ijn  K ;
! +Sg+Ess:%>in   K ;
! +Pl+Nom:%>a    K ;
! +Pl+Gen:%>ij   K ;
! +Pl+Acc:%>ijt  K ;
! +Pl+Ill:%>ijda K ;
! +Pl+Com:%>ij   K ;

LEXICON ARABICCASECOLL
  +Sg+Nom:%>s    K ;
! +Sg+Gen:%>sa   K ;
! +Sg+Acc:%>sav  K ;
! +Sg+Ill:%>sij  K ;
! +Sg+Loc:%>sin  K ;
! +Sg+Loc:%>sis  K ;
! +Sg+Com:%>sijn K ;

 

LEXICON ROMNUMTAGOBL
 +Rom+Sg+Ill:%>hán        # ;
 +Rom+Sg+Ill:%>n        # ;
 +Rom+Sg+Loc:%>st        # ;
 +Rom+Sg+Com:%>jn       # ;
 +Rom+Ess:%>n        # ;
 +Rom+Sg+Par:%>d        # ;


! A final section with some isolated numeral expresssions !
! ------------------------------------------------------- !
